Arkansas, session 2025, HB1965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 4, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 40 — Arkansas Healthy Food Retail Act of 2025

15-4-4001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas
Healthy Food Retail Act of 2025".

15-4-4002. Legislative findings and intent.
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) When fresh produce and other healthy foods are not readily
available or affordable, people, particularly low-income families, children,
and the elderly, face serious barriers to eating a healthy diet;
(2) Research in Arkansas and the nation shows that residents of
*JLL147*
03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147

HB1965
low-income, minority, and rural communities are most often affected by high
rates of obesity and poor access to supermarkets and other healthy food
retailers;
(3) Obesity, which frequently results from poor diet and
physical inactivity, is America's fast-growing cause of disease and death;
(4) Arkansas has one of the highest rates of obesity nationwide,
putting growing numbers of Arkansas adults and children at risk for
developing heart disease, Type 2 diabetes, hypertension, certain cancers, and
other health problems;
(5) Increasing access to retail food outlets that sell fresh
fruits and vegetables and other healthy food is an essential strategy for
fighting the obesity epidemic and improving health;
(6) Studies have shown that people with better access to
supermarkets and fresh produce tend to have healthier diets and lower levels
of obesity; and
(7) Developing quality retail food outlets also creates jobs,
expands markets for Arkansas farmers, and supports economic vitality in
underserved communities.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Healthy Food
Retailer Program established under this subchapter shall:
(1) Provide a reliable source of financing for healthy food
retailers operating in underserved communities in the state in both rural and
urban areas;
(2) Increase access to affordable healthy food to improve diets
and health;
(3) Promote the sale and consumption of fresh produce,
particularly fresh produce that is grown in Arkansas; and
(4) Support the expansion of economic opportunities in low-
income and rural communities.

15-4-4003. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Funding" means grants, loans, or a combination of grants
and loans;
(2) "Healthy food retailers" means for-profit or nonprofit
retailers that sell high-quality, fresh produce at competitive prices to
03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147

HB1965
various sellers, including without limitation supermarkets, grocery stores,
and farmers' markets; and
(3) "Underserved community" means a geographic area with limited
access to healthy food retailers in a low-income, low-access, or high-poverty
area or an area otherwise determined to have serious healthy, nutritional
food limitations.

15-4-4004. Healthy Food Retailer Program — Establishment and
administration.
(a) To the extent funds are available, the Arkansas Economic
Development Commission, in cooperation with public and private sector
partners, shall establish the Healthy Food Retailer Program that provides
funding directly and indirectly to healthy food retailers that increase
access to fresh fruits and vegetables and other affordable healthy food in
underserved communities.
(b)(1)(A) The commission may contract with one (1) or more qualified
nonprofit organizations, community development financial institutions, or
consultants experienced in food retail to design and administer the Healthy
Food Retailer Program through a public-private partnership to leverage funds,
market the program statewide, evaluate applicants, make funding award
decisions, underwrite loans, and monitor compliance and impact.
(B) A nonprofit organization or a community development
financial institution that partners with the commission may allocate a
portion of the funds received under the Healthy Food Retailer Program to
cover administrative costs associated with administering the program.
(2) The commission shall coordinate with complimentary nutrition
assistance and education programs in administering the Healthy Food Retailer
Program.
(c) The Healthy Food Retailer Program shall provide funding on a
competitive basis as appropriate for each project awarded funding.
(d) The Healthy Food Retailer Program may provide funding through
grants, subgrants, and contracts for projects that align with the goals of
the Health Food Retailer Program, including without limitation:
(1) The construction of new healthy food retailers, including
without limitation supermarkets and grocery stores;
(2) Predevelopment activities, store renovations, expansion, and
03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147

HB1965
infrastructure upgrades that improve the availability and quality of fresh
produce;
(3) Farmers' markets, public markets, food cooperatives, mobile
markets and delivery projects, and distribution projects that enable healthy
food retailers in underserved communities to obtain fresh produce regularly;
(4) Equity investments, credit enhancement initiatives,
subordinate debt, and interest rate buy downs that benefit healthy food
retailers; and
(5) Other projects that create or improve healthy food retailers
that meet the intent of this subchapter, as determined by the commission.
(e) Funding made available through the Healthy Food Retailer Program
may be used for the following purposes:
(1) Site acquisition and preparation;
(2) Construction costs;
(3) Equipment and furnishings;
(4) Workforce training;
(5) Security;
(6) Certain predevelopment costs as determined by the
commission, including without limitation market studies and appraisals;
(7) Financial assistance, including without limitation working
capital for first-time inventory, start-up costs, and interest rate buy down;
and
(8) Consulting and technical assistance, including without
limitation stakeholder training and the provision of informational resources
to stakeholders.
(f) A restaurant is not eligible for funding under this subchapter.
(g) An applicant for funding under this subchapter may include without
limitation a sole proprietorship, partnership, limited liability company,
corporation, cooperative, community development entity, institution of higher
education, or governmental entity.
(h) To be considered for funding under this section, an applicant
shall meet the following criteria:
(1) The project for which the applicant seeks funding benefits
an underserved community;
(2) The applicant demonstrates a meaningful commitment to
selling fresh produce according to a measurable standard established by the
03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147

HB1965
commission; and
(3) The applicant accepts the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program and the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants,
and Children (WIC) benefits.
(i) The commission or its designee shall evaluate each applicant based
on the following criteria to determine the award of funding:
(1) The applicant's demonstrated capacity to successfully
implement the project, including without limitation the applicant's relevant
experience and the likelihood that the project will be economically self-
sustaining;
(2) The ability of the applicant to repay debt;
(3) The degree to which the project requires an investment of
public funding to move forward, create an impact, or be competitive;
(4) The level of need in the underserved community to be served
by the project, which may include the consideration of factors that will
improve or preserve retail access for low-income residents, such as the
proximity to public transit lines;
(5) The degree to which the project will promote sales of fresh
produce, particularly Arkansas-grown fruits and vegetables;
(6) The degree to which the project will positively impact the
underserved community, including without limitation creating or retaining
local residents' jobs; and
(7) Any other criteria that the commission determines are
consistent with the intent of this subchapter.
(j) The commission shall:
(1) Establish Healthy Food Retailer Program benchmarks and
reporting processes to ensure that the Healthy Food Retailer Program benefits
both rural and urban communities in Arkansas;
(2) Establish monitoring and accountability mechanisms for
projects that receive funding under this section, such as tracking sales data
for fresh produce;
(3) Prepare and submit an annual report to the Legislative
Council, or if the General Assembly is in session, the Joint Budget
Committee, concerning any projects funded and the outcome data related to
each project; and
(4) Establish rules for implementing this subchapter.
03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147

HB1965
(k) To the extent practicable, funds described in this subchapter may
be used to leverage other funding, including without limitation new markets
tax credits, federal and foundation grant programs, incentives available to
designated renewal communities or empowerment zones, operator equity, and
funding from private-sector financial institutions under the Community
Reinvestment Act of 1977, 12 U.S.C. § 2901 et seq., as it existed on January
1, 2025.





























03/28/2025 11:20:35 AM JLL147